District of Columbia statutes.
7-1671.04

Recommending physician; protections.

(a)

A physician may recommend the use of medical marijuana to a qualifying patient if the physician:

(1)

Is in a bona fide physician-patient relationship with the qualifying patient; and

(2)

Makes the recommendation based upon the physician’s assessment of the qualifying patient’s medical history, current medical condition, and a review of other approved medications and treatments that might provide the qualifying patient with relief from a qualifying medical condition or the side effects of a qualifying medical treatment.

(b)

(1)

A physician’s recommendation that a qualifying patient may use medical marijuana shall be signed by the physician and include:

(A)

The physician’s medical license number; and

(B)

A statement that the use of medical marijuana is necessary for the treatment of a qualifying medical condition or the side effects of a qualifying medical treatment.

(2)

A physician’s recommendation shall be valid only if it is written on a form prescribed by the Mayor.

(c)

Except as provided in § 7-1671.07, a physician shall not be subject to any penalty, including arrest, prosecution, or disciplinary proceeding, or denial of any right or privilege, for advising a qualifying patient about the use of medical marijuana or recommending the use of medical marijuana to a qualifying patient pursuant to this chapter and the rules issued pursuant to § 7-1671.13.

(d)

A physician recommending the use of medical marijuana by a qualifying patient shall not have a professional office located at a dispensary or cultivation center or receive financial compensation from a dispensary or cultivation center, or a director, officer, member, incorporator, agent, or employee of a dispensary or cultivation center.

Feb. 25, 2010, D.C. Law 13-315, § 5
as added July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-210, § 2, 57 DCR 4798
This section is referenced in § 3-1202.03 and § 7-1671.02.